Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-684
Construction; operation; location; eminent domain; procedure.

When a system of waterworks or sewerage, power, heating, lighting, or drainage shall have been adopted as provided under sections 16-680 to 16-683, the mayor and city council may erect and construct and maintain such system of waterworks or sewerage or power plant, lighting, heating, or drainage, either within or without the corporate limits of the city, make all needful rules and regulations concerning their use, and do all acts necessary for their construction, completion, management, and control not inconsistent with law, including the taking of private property for the public use for their construction and operation. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724, except as to property specifically excluded by section 76-703 and as to which sections 19-701 to 19-707 are applicable.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 59, p. 275;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 186;

Laws 1913, c. 35, § 3, p. 114;

R.S.1913, § 4959;

C.S.1922, § 4128;

Laws 1929, c. 43, § 1, p. 187;

C.S.1929, § 16-657;

R.S.1943, § 16-684;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 54, p. 472;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 142.

A city may acquire existing electric and waterworks systems by eminent domain, but such power cannot extend so as to acquire a utilities property which furnishes several kinds of utility service, and is operated as a unit. Central Power Co. v. Nebraska City, 112 F.2d 471 (8th Cir. 1940).